Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3504
Approved certifying body, defined.

Approved certifying body means a national certification organization which is approved by the board, certifies qualified surgical first assistants, has eligibility requirements related to education and practice, and offers an examination in an area of practice which meets guidelines and tests approved by the board.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 4.